Wyoming statutes. Title 40 Trade and Commerce
Part 3. Disclosure and Advertising

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Award of attorney's fees under § 130(a) of Truth in Lending Act (15 USCS § 1640(a)), 140 ALR Fed 557.

§ 40-14-320.
Applicability; information required.

For purposes of this part, a consumer loan includes a loan secured primarily by an interest in land as defined byW.S. 40-14-304(c).

and (c) Repealed by Laws 1982, ch. 61, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 2013, ch. 124, § 3.

Disclosure and advertising of consumer credit shall be made pursuant to the federal Consumer Credit Protection Act.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 3-301; W.S. 1957, § 40-3-301; Laws 1975, ch. 167, § 1; 1982, ch. 61, § 1; 1983, ch. 109, § 1; 2013 ch. 124, §§ 2, 3, effective July 1, 2013; 2021 ch. 14, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, repealed (d) which read: “The information required under this part shall include a full statement of closing costs to be incurred by the consumer which shall be presented, in accordance with regulations of the administrator prior to the time when any down payment is made, or, in the case of a consumer loan involving a residential mortgage transaction, at the time the creditor makes a commitment with respect to the transaction. The administrator may provide by regulation that any portion of the information required to be disclosed by this part may be given in the form of estimates where the provider of such information is not in a position to know exact information.” and rewrote (e).

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, substituted "as defined by W.S.

40-14-304

(c)" for "without regard to the rate of the loan finance charge if the loan is otherwise a consumer loan (W.S.

40-14-304

)" in (a).

Cited

in

Anderson v. Rocky Mountain Fed. Sav. & Loan Ass'n, 651 P.2d 269,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 385

(Wyo. 1982).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Award of attorney's fees under § 130(a) of Truth in Lending Act (15 U.S.C. § 1640(a)), 140 ALR Fed 557.

§§ 40-14-321 and 40-14-322.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1982, ch. 61, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1971, ch. 191, §§ 3-302, 3-303, related to general disclosure requirements. For present similar provisions, see §

40-14-320

.

§ 40-14-323.
Statement of rate.

through (d) Repealed by Laws 1982, ch. 61, § 2.

A statement of rate complies with this part if it does not vary from the accurately computed rate by more than the following tolerances:

The annual percentage rate may be more or less than the actual rate by not more than one-eighth of one percent (.125%) or may be rounded to the nearest one-fourth of one percent (.25%) for consumer loans payable in substantially equal installments when a lender determines the total loan finance charge on the basis of a single add-on, discount, periodic or other rate, and the rate is converted into an annual percentage rate under procedures prescribed by rule by the administrator;

The administrator may authorize by rule the use of rate tables or charts which may provide for the disclosure of annual percentage rates which vary from the rate determined in accordance with paragraph (i) of this subsection by not more than the tolerances the administrator may allow; the administrator may not allow a tolerance greater than eight percent (8%) of that rate except to simplify compliance where irregular payments are involved; and

In case a lender determines the annual percentage rate in a manner other than as described in paragraph (i) or (ii) of this subsection, the administrator may authorize by rule other reasonable tolerances.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 3-304; W.S. 1957, § 40-3-304; Laws 1981, ch. 147, § 1; 1982, ch. 61, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to disclosure, see §

40-14-320

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Award of attorney's fees under § 130(a) of Truth in Lending Act (15 U.S.C. § 1640(a)), 140 ALR Fed 557.

What constitutes Truth in Lending Act violation which “was not intentional and resulted from bona fide error notwithstanding maintenance of procedures reasonably adapted to avoid any such error” within meaning of § 130(c) of Act (15 USC § 1640(c)) 153 ALR Fed 193.

§§ 40-14-324 through 40-14-331.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1982, ch. 61, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1971, ch. 191, §§ 3-305 through 3-312, related to specific disclosure requirements. For present similar provisions, see §

40-14-320

.